Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Chapter 5 Statue and Replica of Esther Morris and Chief Washakie

§ 8-5-101.
Statue to be placed in capitol of United States.

The statue of Esther Morris, made pursuant to Section 1, Chapter 45, Session Laws of 1955, shall be placed in the capitol of the United States, in accordance with the provisions of section 187 of Title 40 of the United States Code Annotated, and shall there remain as commemorative of her distinguished service to the territory and the state.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 45, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 8-61; W.S. 1977, § 8-7-106; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1955, ch. 45, § 1, referred to in this section, appeared as former §

8-7-101

, which was deleted by Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1, which revised this title.

40 U.S.C. § 187 is now codified as 2 U.S.C. § 2131.

§ 8-5-102.
Replica to be placed in state capital.

A replica of the statue specified in W.S.

8-5-101

shall be placed in the capital of Wyoming and shall there remain as commemorative of Esther Morris’s distinguished service to the territory and the state.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 180, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 8-66; W.S. 1977, 8-7-205; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-5-103.
Statue of Chief Washakie.

In the event a commission is appointed to obtain funding for the creation of a statue of Chief Washakie and upon completion of the statue, the statue of Chief Washakie shall be placed in the capitol of the United States, in accordance with the provisions of section 187 of Title 40 of the United States Code, and shall remain there as commemorative of Chief Washakie’s historical significance to the territory and the state.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 77, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

40 U.S.C. § 187 is now codified as 2 U.S.C. § 2131.